Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,111
Distributions to trustee.

(a) Before distributing to a trustee, the personal representative may require that the trust be registered if the state in which it is to be administered requires registration and that the trustee inform the beneficiaries as provided in section 30-3878.

(b) If the trust instrument does not excuse the trustee from giving bond, the personal representative may petition the appropriate court to require that the trustee post bond if he or she apprehends that distribution might jeopardize the interests of persons who are not able to protect themselves, and he or she may withhold distribution until the court has acted.

(c) No inference of negligence on the part of the personal representative shall be drawn from his or her failure to exercise the authority conferred by subsections (a) and (b).

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 189, UPC § 3-913;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 129.